trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
    <pardef n="comp/oner__vblex">
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usiere</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usiere</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usiereis</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usieren</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usieres</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usiese</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usiese</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usieseis</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usiesen</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usieses</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usiéremos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>usiésemos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondremos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondrá</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondrán</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondrás</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondré</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondréis</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondría</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondría</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondríais</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondríamos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondrían</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ondrías</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>one</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__canta" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>one</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oned</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oned</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantad" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onemos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onen</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oner</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oner</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ones</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onga</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onga</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onga</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongamos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongamos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongan</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongan</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongas</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongo</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongáis</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongámo</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ongámos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oniendo</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oniéndo</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oné</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantá" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onéd</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantád" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onéis</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onér</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantár" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onía</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onía</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oníais</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>oníamos</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onían</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>onías</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>uesta</l>
        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>uestas</l>

      <e lm="componer"><i>comp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="disponer"><i>disp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="exponer"><i>exp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="imponer"><i>imp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="oponer"><i>op</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="proponer"><i>prop</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="reponer"><i>rep</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="suponer"><i>sup</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="anteponer" a="eleka"><i>antep</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="interponer" a="eleka"><p><l>interp</l><r>interp</r></p><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="postponer" a="eleka"><p><l>postp</l><r>postp</r></p><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="poner en entredicho" a="eleka"><i>p</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/><p><l><b/>en<b/>entredicho</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>entredicho</g></r></p></e>
